California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
(d) “Ranch Plan Planned Community” means the comprehensive land use, conservation, and development program initially approved by the Orange County Board of Supervisors on November 8, 2004, and covering the remaining 22,815 acres of the historic Rancho Mission Viejo located in southeastern Orange County.

(e) “Transportation planning agency” means the Orange County Transportation Authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 442, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1965.2.

(a) The County of Orange may, by ordinance or resolution, adopt a NEV transportation plan for the Ranch Plan Planned Community.

(b) The transportation plan shall have received a prior review and the comments of the transportation planning agency and any agency having traffic law enforcement responsibilities in the County of Orange.

(c) The transportation plan may include the use of a state highway, or any crossing of the highway, subject to the approval of the Department of Transportation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 442, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1965.3.

The transportation plan shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following elements:

(a) Route selection, which includes a finding that the route will accommodate NEVs without an adverse impact upon traffic safety, and will consider, among other things, the travel needs of commuters and other users.

(b) Transportation interfacing, which shall include, but not be limited to, coordination with other modes of transportation so that a NEV driver may employ multiple modes of transportation in reaching a destination in the plan area.

(c) Provision for NEV related facilities including, but not limited to, special
 access points and NEV crossings.

(d) Provisions for parking facilities, including, but not limited to, community commercial centers, golf courses, public areas, parks, and other destination locations.

(e) Provisions for special paving, road markings, signage and striping for NEV travel lanes, road crossings, parking, and circulation.

(f) Provisions for NEV electrical charging stations.

(g) NEV lanes for the purposes of the transportation plan shall be classified as follows:

(1) Class I NEV routes provide for a completely separate right-of-way for the use of NEVs.

(2) Class II NEV routes provide for a separate striped lane
 adjacent to roadways with speed limits of 55 miles per hour or less.

(3) Class III NEV routes provide for shared use by NEVs with conventional vehicle traffic on streets with a speed limit of
 35 miles per hour or less.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 156, Sec. 1.   (SB 241)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1965.4.

If the County of Orange adopts a NEV transportation plan for the Ranch Plan Planned Community, it shall do both of the following:

(a) Establish minimum general design criteria for the development, planning, and construction of separated NEV lanes, including, but not limited to, the design speed of the facility, the space requirements of the NEV, and roadway design criteria.

(b) In cooperation with the department, establish uniform specifications and symbols for signs, markers, and traffic control devices to control NEV traffic; to warn of dangerous conditions, obstacles, or hazards; to designate the right-of-way as between NEVs, other vehicles, and bicycles; to state the nature and destination of the NEV lane; and to warn pedestrians, bicyclists, and motorists of the presence of NEV traffic.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 442, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1965.5.

If the County of Orange adopts a NEV transportation plan for the Ranch Plan Planned Community, it shall also adopt all of the following as part of the plan:

(a) NEVs eligible to use NEV lanes shall meet the safety requirements for low-speed vehicles as set forth in Section 571.500 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) Minimum safety criteria for NEV operators, including, but not limited to, requirements relating to NEV maintenance and NEV safety. Operators shall be required to possess a valid California driver’s license and to comply with the financial responsibility requirements established pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 16000) of Division 7 of the Vehicle Code.

(c) (1) Restrictions limiting the operation of NEVs to separated NEV lanes on those roadways identified in the transportation plan, and allowing only those NEVs and golf carts that meet the safety equipment requirements specified in the plan to be operated on separated NEV lanes of approved roadways in the plan area.

(2) Any person operating a NEV in the plan area in violation of this subdivision is guilty of an infraction punishable by a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100).

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 442, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1965.6.

(a) If the County of Orange adopts a NEV transportation plan for the Ranch Plan Planned Community pursuant to this chapter, the county shall submit a report to the Legislature on or before November 1, 2020, in consultation with the Department of Transportation, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, and local law enforcement agencies.

(b) The report shall include all of the following:

(1) A description of the NEV transportation plan and its elements that have been authorized up to that time.

(2) An evaluation of the effectiveness of the NEV transportation plan,
 including its impact on traffic flows and safety.

(3) A recommendation as to whether this chapter should be terminated, continued in existence and applicable solely to the Ranch Plan Planned Community, or expanded statewide.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 156, Sec. 2.   (SB 241)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. County of San Diego Neighborhood Electric Vehicle Transportation Plans [1966. - 1966.8.]

1966.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this article, to authorize the County of San Diego or any city in the county to establish a neighborhood electric vehicle (NEV) transportation plan. The purpose of this NEV transportation plan is to further the San Diego region’s vision of facilitating the efficient movement of people and goods to support a sustainable and healthy region, a vibrant economy, and an outstanding quality of life for all.

(b) It is further the intent of the Legislature that if the County of San Diego or any city in the county adopts an NEV plan that this NEV transportation plan be designed and developed to provide flexible and economical travel options for residents, employees, and visitors, to best serve the
 functional travel needs of the plan area, to have the physical safety of the NEV driver or the passenger’s person and property as a major planning component, and to have the capacity to accommodate NEV drivers of every legal age and ability.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 564, Sec. 4.   (SB 1151)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 1966.8.)
-------------------------------------------

1966.1.

The following definitions apply to this article:

(a) “Plan area” means any portion of the County of San Diego, or any portion of any city in the county, and any streets and roads under the jurisdiction of the county or city, to the extent the county or city has adopted an NEV transportation plan pursuant to Section 1966.2, including the privately owned land of any owner that consents to its inclusion in the plan.

(b) “Neighborhood electric vehicle” or “NEV” means a low-speed vehicle as defined by Section 385.5 of the Vehicle Code.

(c) “NEV routes” means all publicly or privately owned facilities that provide for NEV travel, including
 roadways designated by signs or permanent markings that are shared with pedestrians, bicyclists, and other motorists in the plan area.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 564, Sec. 4.   (SB 1151)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 1966.8.)
-------------------------------------------

1966.2.

(a) The County of San Diego or any city in the county may, by ordinance or resolution, adopt an NEV transportation plan for the plan area within its jurisdiction. Two or more jurisdictions may jointly adopt an NEV transportation plan for all or a portion of the territory under their respective jurisdictions.

(b) If the County of San Diego or any city in the county adopts an NEV plan, the entity adopting the plan shall consult with the San Diego Association of Governments (SANDAG) and any agency having traffic law enforcement responsibilities in an entity included in the plan area.

(c) The NEV transportation plan may include the use of a state highway, or any crossing of the
 highway, subject to the approval of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 564, Sec. 4.   (SB 1151)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 1966.8.)
-------------------------------------------

1966.3.

If the County of San Diego or any city in the county adopts an NEV plan, the NEV transportation plan shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the following elements:

(a) Route selection, that includes a finding that the route accommodates NEVs without an adverse impact upon traffic safety and shall consider, among other things, the travel needs of commuters and other users.

(b) Transportation interfacing, that shall include, but not be limited to, coordination with other modes of transportation so that an NEV driver or passenger may employ multiple modes of transportation in reaching a destination in the plan area, including walking, biking, rideables, transit, and other vehicles.

(c) Provision for NEV-related facilities, including, but not limited to, special access points, special NEV turnouts, and NEV crossings.

(d) Provisions for NEV parking facilities at destination locations, including, but not limited to, transit stations, educational institutions, medical facilities, shopping areas, job and community centers, and public parks.

(e) Provisions for special paving, road markings, signage, and striping for NEV travel lanes, road crossings, parking, and circulation, as appropriate.

(f) Provisions for NEV electrical charging stations.

(g) Community involvement in planning.

(h) Coordination with
 long-range transportation planning.

(i) A map showing the NEV route network. NEV routes for the purposes of the NEV transportation plan shall be classified as follows:

(1) Class I NEV routes that provide for a completely separate right-of-way for the use of NEVs.

(2) Class II NEV routes that provide for a separately striped lane on roadways with speed limits of 55 miles per hour or less.

(3) Class III NEV routes that provide for shared use by NEVs with conventional vehicle traffic on streets with speed limits of 35 miles per hour or less.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 564, Sec. 4.   (SB 1151)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 1966.8.)
-------------------------------------------

1966.4.

If the County of San Diego or any city in the county adopts an NEV transportation plan for the plan area pursuant to this article it shall do both of the following:

(a) Establish minimum general design criteria for the development, planning, and construction of separated NEV lanes, including, but not limited to, the design speed of the facility, the space requirements of the NEV lane, and roadway design criteria, if the plan envisions separated NEV lanes.

(b) In cooperation with the department and SANDAG, establish uniform specifications and symbols for signs, markers, and traffic control devices to control NEV traffic; to warn of dangerous conditions, obstacles, or hazards, to designate the
 right-of-way as between NEVs, other vehicles, and bicycles, as may be applicable, to state the nature and destination of the NEV lane, and to warn pedestrians, bicyclists, and motorists of the presence of NEV traffic.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 564, Sec. 4.   (SB 1151)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 1966.8.)
-------------------------------------------

1966.5.

If the County of San Diego or any city in the county adopts an NEV transportation plan for the plan area pursuant to this article, it shall also adopt all of the following as part of the plan:

(a) NEVs eligible to use NEV routes shall meet the safety requirements for low-speed vehicles as set forth in Section 571.500 of Chapter V of Subtitle B of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) Minimum safety criteria for NEV operators, including, but not limited to, requirements relating to NEV maintenance and NEV safety. Operators shall be required to possess a valid California driver’s license and to comply with the financial responsibility requirements established pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing
 with Section 16000) of Division 7 of the Vehicle Code.

(c) (1) Restrictions limiting the operation of NEVs to NEV routes identified in the NEV transportation plan and allowing only those NEVs that meet the safety equipment requirements specified in the plan to be operated on those routes.

(2) A person who operates an NEV in the plan area in violation of this subdivision is guilty of an infraction punishable by a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100).

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 564, Sec. 4.   (SB 1151)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 1966.8.)
-------------------------------------------

1966.6.

If the County of San Diego or any city in the county adopts an NEV transportation plan, it may acquire, by dedication, purchase, or condemnation, real property, including easements or rights-of-way, to establish NEV routes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 564, Sec. 4.   (SB 1151)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 1966.8.)
-------------------------------------------

1966.7.

(a) If the County of San Diego or any city in the county adopts an NEV transportation plan for the plan area pursuant to this article, the county or city shall submit a report, in consultation with SANDAG, the department, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, and any applicable local law enforcement agency, to the Legislature within two years of the date the NEV transportation plan is adopted.

(b) The report shall include all of the following:

(1) A description of the NEV transportation plan that has been authorized up to that time, including a description of the use of shared fleets and any charging, parking, or federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 elements
 that have been included in the plan.

(2) An evaluation of the effectiveness of the NEV transportation plan, that may include its impact on traffic flows, vehicle miles traveled, greenhouse gas emission reductions, and safety.

(3) A recommendation as to whether this article should be terminated, continued in effect, or expanded statewide.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 564, Sec. 4.   (SB 1151)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 1966.8.)
-------------------------------------------

1966.8.

(a) This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute that is enacted before January 1, 2029, deletes or extends that date.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if the County of San Diego or any city in the county adopts an NEV transportation plan for the plan area pursuant to this article within two years of January 1, 2029, the county or that city in the county shall comply with the reporting requirement provided in Section 1966.7.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 564, Sec. 4.   (SB 1151)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 2, commencing with Section 1966.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. County of Los Angeles Neighborhood Electric Vehicle Transportation Plans [1966.10. - 1966.17.]

1966.10.

It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this chapter, to authorize the County of Los Angeles or a city in the county to establish a neighborhood electric vehicle (NEV) transportation plan. The purpose of this NEV transportation plan is to further the vision of creating a sustainable region that reduces gasoline demand and vehicle emissions by offering a cleaner, more economical means of local transportation within the plan area. It is the further intent of the Legislature that this NEV transportation plan be designed and developed to best serve
 the functional travel needs of the community, to have the physical safety of the NEV driver’s person and property as a major planning component, and to have the capacity to accommodate NEV drivers of every legal age and range of skills.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 158, Sec. 1.   (AB 2432)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2040, pursuant to Section 1966.17.)
-------------------------------------------

1966.11.

The following definitions apply to this article:

(a) “Plan area” means any portion of the County of Los Angeles, or any portion of any city in the county, and any streets and roads under the jurisdiction of the county or a
 city, to the extent the County of Los Angeles or a city has adopted a NEV transportation plan pursuant to Section 1966.12, including the privately owned land of any owner that consents to its inclusion in the plan.

(b) “Neighborhood electric vehicle” or “NEV” means a low-speed vehicle as defined by Section 385.5 of the Vehicle Code.

(c) “NEV lanes” means all publicly or privately owned facilities that provide for NEV travel, including roadways designated by signs or permanent markings that are shared with pedestrians, bicyclists, and other motorists in the plan area.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 158, Sec. 1.   (AB 2432)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2040, pursuant to Section 1966.17.)
-------------------------------------------

1966.12.

(a) The County of Los Angeles or any city in the county may, by ordinance or resolution, adopt a NEV transportation plan within its jurisdiction. Two or more jurisdictions may jointly adopt a NEV transportation plan for all or a portion of the territory under their respective jurisdictions.

(b) If the County of Los Angeles or any city in the county adopts a NEV plan, the entity adopting the plan shall consult with the Southern California Association of Governments and any agency having traffic law enforcement responsibilities in an entity included in the plan.

(c) The transportation plan may include the use of a state highway, or any crossing of the highway, subject to the approval of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 158, Sec. 1.   (AB 2432)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2040, pursuant to Section 1966.17.)
-------------------------------------------

1966.13.

The transportation plan shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the following elements:

(a) Route selection, which includes a finding that the route will accommodate NEVs without an adverse impact upon traffic safety and will consider, among other things, the travel needs of commuters and other users.

(b) Transportation interfacing, which shall include, but not be limited to, coordination with other modes of transportation so that a NEV driver may employ multiple modes of transportation in reaching a destination in the plan area.

(c) Provision for
 NEV-related facilities, including, but not limited to, special access points, special NEV turnouts, and NEV crossings.

(d) Provisions for parking facilities at destination locations, including, but not limited to, community commercial centers, golf courses, public areas, and parks.

(e) Provisions for special paving, road markings, signage, and striping for NEV travel lanes, road crossings, parking, and circulation, as appropriate.

(f) Provisions for NEV electrical charging stations.

(g) Community involvement in planning.

(h) A map showing the NEV route network. NEV routes for the purposes of the transportation plan shall be classified as follows:

(1) Class I NEV routes provide for a completely separate right-of-way for the use of NEVs.

(2) Class II NEV routes provide for a separate striped lane adjacent to roadways with speed limits of 55 miles per hour or less.

(3) Class III NEV routes provide for shared use by NEVs with conventional vehicle traffic on streets with speed limits of 35 miles per hour or
 less.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 158, Sec. 1.   (AB 2432)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2040, pursuant to Section 1966.17.)
-------------------------------------------

1966.14.

If the County of Los Angeles or any city in the county adopts a NEV transportation plan pursuant to this article, it shall do all of the following:

(a) If the transportation plan includes separated NEV lanes, establish minimum general design criteria for the development, planning, and construction of separated NEV lanes, including, but not limited to, the design speed of the facility, the space requirements of the NEV, and roadway design criteria.

(b) In cooperation with the department, establish uniform specifications and symbols for signs, markers, and traffic control devices to control NEV traffic; to warn of dangerous conditions, obstacles, or hazards; to designate the right-of-way as between
 NEVs, other vehicles, and bicycles, as may be applicable; to state the nature and destination of the NEV lane; and to warn pedestrians, bicyclists, and motorists of the presence of NEV traffic.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 158, Sec. 1.   (AB 2432)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2040, pursuant to Section 1966.17.)
-------------------------------------------

1966.15.

(a) If the County of Los Angeles or any city in the county adopts a NEV transportation plan pursuant to this article, it shall also adopt all of the following as part of the plan:

(1) NEVs eligible to use NEV lanes shall meet the safety requirements for low-speed vehicles as set forth in Section 571.500 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) Minimum safety criteria for NEV operators, including, but not limited to, requirements relating to NEV maintenance and NEV safety. Operators shall be required to possess a valid California driver’s license and to comply with the financial responsibility requirements established pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 16000) of Division 7 of the Vehicle Code.

(3) Restrictions limiting the operation of NEVs to NEV routes identified in the transportation plan, and allowing only those NEVs that meet the safety equipment requirements specified in the plan to be operated on those routes.

(b) Any person operating a NEV in the plan area in violation of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) is guilty of an infraction punishable
 by a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100).

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 158, Sec. 1.   (AB 2432)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2040, pursuant to Section 1966.17.)
-------------------------------------------

1966.16.

(a) If the County of Los Angeles or any city in the county adopts a NEV transportation plan pursuant to this article, the entity adopting the plan shall submit a report, in consultation with
 the Southern California Association of Governments, the department, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, and any applicable local law enforcement agency to the Legislature
 within two years of the date the NEV transportation plan is adopted.

(b) The report shall include all of the following:

(1) A description of the NEV transportation plan and its elements that have been authorized up to that time.

(2) An evaluation of the effectiveness of the NEV transportation plan, including its impact on traffic flows and safety.

(3) A recommendation as to whether this article should be terminated, continued in
 existence, or expanded statewide.

(c) (1) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(2) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on January 1, 2033.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 158, Sec. 1.   (AB 2432)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1966.17.

This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2040, and as of that date, is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 158, Sec. 1.   (AB 2432)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2040, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 3, commencing with Section 1966.10. Exception: Section 1966.16 is repealed on January 1, 2033.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Treasure Island Transportation Management [1967. - 1967.11.]

1967.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the Treasure Island Transportation Management Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 317, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1967.1.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) It is essential for the economic well-being of the state and the maintenance of a high quality of life that the people of California have efficient transportation systems that will reduce traffic congestion, vehicle miles traveled, and greenhouse gas emissions, and improve travel times and air quality.

(b) In 2006, the Legislature passed Assembly Bill 32 (Ch. 488, Stats. 2006), which enacted the California Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 (Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code), a landmark act that establishes a first-in-the-world comprehensive program of regulatory and market mechanisms to achieve real, quantifiable, cost-effective reductions of greenhouse gases.

(c) Implementation of the California Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 will require creative and innovative solutions, including strategies designed to integrate land use and transportation measures to reduce vehicle miles traveled and traffic congestion, improve travel times, and encourage transit use.

(d) The proposed development of Treasure Island includes an innovative and comprehensive land use and transportation program designed to discourage motor vehicle usage, reduce vehicle miles traveled, encourage public transit, and serve as a model of sustainable neighborhood development. An element of the transportation program is the use of congestion pricing.

(e) Congestion pricing is a potentially useful tool for influencing the behavior of drivers of private motor vehicles, controlling traffic congestion, and reducing vehicle miles traveled and the production of greenhouse gases. The potential of congestion pricing for this purpose is well documented and has been implemented or is under consideration in a number of prominent, high-traffic cities around the world, including London, Stockholm, and Singapore.

(f) Because Treasure Island is located adjacent to an urban area with a single point of vehicular access, but is easily served by multimodal public transit, it is an ideal candidate for a demonstration program designed to test the feasibility of congestion pricing as a tool to encourage and fund public transit use and reduce vehicle miles traveled in furtherance of the state’s goals to improve regional air quality and reduce greenhouse gas emissions and traffic congestion.

(g) The proposed development of Treasure Island is a leading example of performance-based infrastructure that uses private innovation, access to financing, and management efficiencies to build infrastructure, combined with the social responsibility, environmental awareness, local knowledge, safety requirements, and job generation concerns of the public sector. The proposed transportation program for Treasure Island, including congestion pricing, will further these goals by allowing private development to advance funding and resources for construction of a public transit infrastructure and mixed-use development in a transit-oriented and sustainable manner, then generating from that development congestion pricing fees that will maximize use of public transit and generate revenues to offset the public sector’s costs of public transit facilities and equipment design, construction, operation, and maintenance.

(h) The purpose of the Treasure Island transportation program is to accomplish all of the following:

(1) To facilitate the implementation of an innovative, sustainable transportation program for Treasure Island that will encourage public transit, bicycle, pedestrian, and waterborne modes of transportation, reduce vehicle miles traveled, and minimize the impact of Treasure Island development on the system of state and local roadways affected by the San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge, as well as on the bridge itself, in furtherance of the California Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 (Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code).

(2) To develop a comprehensive set of transportation demand management programs to encourage and facilitate transit use and to minimize the environmental and other impacts of private motor vehicles traveling to, from, and on Treasure Island.

(3) To manage Treasure Island-related transportation in a sustainable manner, to the extent feasible, with the goal of reducing vehicle miles traveled and minimizing carbon emissions and impacts on air and water quality.

(4) To create a flexible institutional structure that can set parking and congestion pricing rates, monitor the performance of the transportation program, collect revenues, and direct generated revenues to transportation services and programs serving Treasure Island.

(5) To promote multimodal access to, from, and on Treasure Island by a wide range of local, regional, and statewide visitors by providing a reliable source of funding for transportation services and programs serving Treasure Island that will include bus transit service provided by the city’s municipal transportation agency, or its successor agency, and ferry service.

(i) The congestion pricing demonstration program authorized by this act includes an important reporting requirement to the Legislature that will allow the Legislature to assess the success of the program in achieving its goals.

(j) The Treasure Island Development Authority and its private development partner have undertaken numerous technical and economic feasibility studies demonstrating the effectiveness of the transportation program to conserve energy, discourage motor vehicle usage, reduce vehicle miles traveled, increase transit ridership, and deliver significant public infrastructure improvements through public-private partnership.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 317, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1967.2.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Authority” means the Treasure Island Development Authority, a nonprofit public benefit corporation established by the board of supervisors that is vested with both redevelopment authority and the power and duty to administer the public trust for commerce, navigation, and fisheries with respect to Treasure Island.

(b) “Board of supervisors” means the Board of Supervisors of the City and County of San Francisco.

(c) “City” means the City and County of San Francisco.

(d) “Congestion pricing fees” means fees that motorists pay to drive in a designated congestion pricing zone that are designed to relieve traffic congestion and promote alternative forms of transportation, and are set and adjusted to reflect traffic patterns, congestion levels, time of day, and other conditions that impact the roadway system.

(e) “Transportation authority” means the San Francisco County Transportation Authority.

(f) “Transportation management agency” means the Treasure Island Mobility Management Agency, formerly the Treasure Island Transportation Management Agency, designated by the board of supervisors pursuant to
 Section 1967.3.

(g) “Transportation program” means a comprehensive transportation program for Treasure Island designed to achieve the goals set forth in Section 1967.1.

(h) “Treasure Island” means Treasure Island and Yerba Buena Island.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 443, Sec. 1.   (AB 141)   Effective September 19, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1967.3.

The authority is formulating a transportation program in connection with the authority’s redevelopment activities on Treasure Island. The board of supervisors directed that the transportation program ensure adequate and reliable funding for transit service for Treasure Island, including bus transit service provided by the city’s municipal transportation agency, or its successor agency. In formulating the transportation program, the authority shall make recommendations for the governance structure of the transportation management agency. Based on the authority’s recommendations, the board of supervisors may designate a board or agency that shall act as the transportation management agency. The board of supervisors may revise or revoke this designation of the transportation management agency and designate a new board or agency to act as the
 transportation management agency at any time. The board of supervisors may also designate itself as the transportation management agency. Notwithstanding Chapter 898 of the Statutes of 1997, any subsequent amendments to that chapter, but subject to Section 1967.5, the transportation management agency shall have the exclusive power to do any or all of the following pursuant to the terms of a resolution or ordinance adopted by the board of supervisors:

(a) Adopt and administer the transportation program and implementing rules and regulations.

(b) Recommend to the board of supervisors an initial fee structure for the imposition of congestion pricing fees applicable to residents and other motorists as they enter or exit Treasure Island in the amount deemed necessary and
 proper by the transportation management agency to implement the transportation program.

(c) Adopt amendments to the congestion pricing fee structure initially adopted by the board of supervisors pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1967.5, as the transportation management agency deems necessary and appropriate from time to time to implement the transportation program, based upon a finding that the amendments to the fee have a relationship or benefit to the motor vehicle drivers who are paying the fee.

(d) Administer and collect congestion pricing fees on Treasure Island.

(e) Adopt on-street and off-street parking regulations for Treasure Island, including regulations limiting parking, stopping,
 standing, or loading and establishing parking privileges and locations, parking meter zones, and other forms of parking regulation similar to those adopted for other areas of San Francisco.

(f) Adopt on-street and off-street parking fees, fines, and penalties for Treasure Island and administer and collect all on-street and off-street parking fees, fines, penalties, and other parking-related revenues on Treasure Island.

(g) Adopt a transit pass fee structure applicable to residents and other users of Treasure Island and administer and collect all Treasure Island transit pass fees.

(h) Fix the rates and charges for services provided or functions performed by the transportation management agency and administer and collect those rates and charges.

(i) Apply
 for, accept, and administer state, federal, local agency, or other public or private grant funds for transportation purposes.

(j) Administer and collect all other revenues generated by the transportation program.

(k) Undertake studies, performance evaluations, and other mechanisms as it deems necessary and proper to adopt and amend the transportation program with the purpose of relieving transportation-related impacts.

(l) Expend its revenues for any purpose related to the transportation program, including costs of implementation, operation, collection and enforcement, maintenance, construction, and administration under the transportation program.

(m) Enter into contracts, cooperative agreements, and direct funding agreements with private parties
 and governmental agencies, including city departments, to the extent deemed necessary and proper by the transportation management agency to implement the transportation program, including for any of the following:

(1) The construction and maintenance of transportation facilities serving Treasure Island that are directly related to the transportation program, including design, preconstruction, and other related costs.

(2) Transit capital improvements and operations for services that directly serve Treasure Island.

(3) Notwithstanding Section 40717.9 of the Health and Safety Code, implementation of transportation impact mitigation measures as adopted from time to time to improve or encourage the use of transit and other nonmotor vehicle means of access to Treasure Island.

(n) Adopt rules and regulations governing high-occupancy vehicles pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 1967.5.

(o) Take all other steps as the transportation management agency deems necessary and proper to implement the transportation program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 417, Sec. 2.   (SB 506)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1967.35.

(a) The transportation management agency is an independent and autonomous public agency governed by the board of the transportation authority, as designated by the board of supervisors on April 1, 2014, or by any future revised governance as designated by the board of supervisors pursuant to Section 1967.3. The transportation management agency is a separate and distinct legal entity responsible for its own obligations, debts, and liabilities and not for the obligations, debts, or liabilities of any other agency or entity.

(b) The transportation management agency is authorized under its own name to do all acts necessary or convenient for the exercise of its
 designated powers and the financing of projects, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) To employ agents or employees.

(2) To acquire, construct, manage, maintain, lease, or operate any public facility or improvements.

(3) To sue and be sued in its own name.

(4) To invest any money not required for the immediate necessities of the transportation management agency, as it determines is advisable.

(c) The transportation management agency shall adopt an annual budget. Its board members shall be compensated as determined by the transportation management agency and shall be
 reimbursed for necessary and reasonable expenses incurred in connection with performing transportation management agency duties. The transportation management agency shall pay all costs
 required by this section.

(d) The transportation authority may make direct contributions or contributions on a reimbursement-for-cost basis to the transportation management agency in furtherance of the exercise of its powers as designated under Section 1967.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 443, Sec. 3.   (AB 141)   Effective September 19, 2014.)